Utah statutes.
20A-11-402.   Officeholder financial reporting requirements -- Termination
of duty to report.
(1)  An officeholder is active and subject to reporting requirements until the
officeholder has filed a statement of dissolution with the lieutenant governor
stating that:
(a)  the officeholder is no longer receiving contributions or public service
assistance and is no longer making expenditures;
(b)  the ending balance on the last summary report filed is zero and the
balance in the separate bank account required by Sections 20A-11-201 and
20A-11-301 is zero; and
(c)  a final summary report in the form required by Section 20A-11-401 showing
a zero balance is attached to the statement of dissolution.
(2)  A statement of dissolution and a final summary report may be filed at any
time.
(3)  Each officeholder shall continue to file the year-end summary report
required by Section 20A-11-401 until the statement of dissolution and final
summary report required by this section are filed with the lieutenant
governor.
(4)  An officeholder may not use a contribution deposited in an account in
accordance with this chapter for:
(a)  a personal use expenditure; or
(b)  an expenditure prohibited by law.
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), a person who is no longer an
officeholder may not expend or transfer the money in a campaign account in a
manner that would cause the former officeholder to recognize the money as
taxable income under federal tax law.
(b)  A person who is no longer an officeholder may transfer the money in a
campaign account in a manner that would cause the former officeholder to
recognize the money as taxable income under federal tax law if the transfer is
made to a campaign account for federal office.
